Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1156.
do enact as follows:AB1156,11Section 1. 16.72 (2) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1156,2,5216.72 (2) (c) To the extent possible, the department shall write specifications 3so as to permit the purchase of materials manufactured in the United States, as 4defined in s. 16.754 (1) (b), or the purchase of local products or services, as defined 5in s. 66.0147 (1) (b).AB1156,26Section 2. 16.754 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1156,2,8716.754 (title) Preference for local products and services and 8American-made materials.AB1156,39Section 3. 16.754 (1) (a) of the statutes is renumbered 16.754 (1) (ar).AB1156,410Section 4. 16.754 (1) (am) of the statutes is created to read:AB1156,2,121116.754 (1) (am) “Local product or service” has the meaning given in s. 66.0147 12(1) (b).AB1156,513Section 5. 16.754 (2) (title) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1156,2,141416.754 (2) (title) Purchase preference preferences.AB1156,615Section 6. 16.754 (2) of the statutes is renumbered 16.754 (2) (b).AB1156,71Section 7. 16.754 (2) (a) of the statutes is created to read:AB1156,3,8216.754 (2) (a) The department, a designated purchasing agent under s. 16.71 3(1), and each agency making purchases under s. 16.74 shall attempt to ensure that 4at least 20 percent of the total amount expended under this subchapter in each 5fiscal year is for local products or services and that the percentage of the total 6amount expended in any fiscal year for local products or services is not lower than 7the percentage of the total amount expended in the previous fiscal year for local 8products or services.AB1156,89Section 8. 16.754 (2m) of the statutes is created to read:AB1156,3,161016.754 (2m) Data. For purposes of measuring compliance with sub. (2) (a), 11the department shall collect from a person who responds to a proposal or submits a 12bid for a contract information regarding the person’s principal place of business. 13The department shall make available to the public on its website the data it collects 14under this subsection as well as an annual evaluation of how well the department, 15its designated purchasing agents under s. 16.71 (1), and each agency making 16purchases under s. 16.74 are meeting the goals under sub. (2) (a).AB1156,917Section 9. 16.754 (3) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1156,4,31816.754 (3) Exemptions. (intro.) Subsection (2) (b) does not apply if the 19materials are purchased for the purpose of commercial resale or for the purpose of 20use in the production of goods for commercial sale. Subsection (2) does not apply to 21the purchase of stationery and printing materials. Subsection (2) (b) does not apply 22if the department determines, under s. 16.75 (1) (a) 2., that the foreign nation or 23subdivision thereof in which the vendor is domiciled does not give preference to 1vendors domiciled in that nation or subdivision in making governmental purchases. 2Subsection (2) (b) does not apply if the department or other person having 3contracting authority in respect to the purchase determines that:AB1156,104Section 10. 66.0147 of the statutes is created to read:AB1156,4,6566.0147 Purchases of Wisconsin goods and services. (1) Definitions. 6In this section:AB1156,4,77(a) “Local governmental unit” has the meaning given in s. 66.0135 (1) (c).AB1156,4,98(b) “Local product or service” means a product or service that is purchased 9from a person whose principal place of business is located in this state.AB1156,4,1610(2) Purchasing goals. (a) It shall be a goal of a local governmental unit 11that, in each fiscal year, at least 20 percent of the aggregate value of purchases of 12products and services by that local governmental unit will be local products or 13services, and it shall be a further goal of the local governmental unit that the 14percentage of the aggregate value of routine purchases of products and services in 15any fiscal year that are local products or services will not be lower than the 16aggregate value of such routine purchases in the previous fiscal year.AB1156,4,2217(b) A local governmental unit shall evaluate its performance in reaching the 18goals specified in par. (a) and shall annually make this evaluation available to the 19public, except that these requirements do not apply to any local governmental unit 20whose governing body enacts an ordinance, adopts a resolution, or takes another 21official action stating that it chooses not to conduct an evaluation of its performance 22in reaching the goals.AB1156,1123Section 11. Initial applicability.AB1156,5,31(1) The treatment of s. 66.0147 and the creation of s. 16.754 (2) (a) first apply 2to purchases made in the fiscal year that begins after the effective date of this 3subsection.AB1156,5,54(2) The treatment of s. 16.754 (2m) first applies to responses made and bids 5submitted in the fiscal year that begins after the effective date of this subsection.AB1156,5,66